Hawaii statutes.
§121-4 Composition. The Hawaii
national guard shall consist of the army national guard, the air national
guard, the inactive national guard, and other organizations and units
authorized by the laws of the United States or the regulations issued thereunder
for the national guard which are recognized by the federal government, and in
which federally recognized officers, warrant officers, and enlisted personnel
are appointed or enlisted. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-4; am L 1969, c
15, §1(b)]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next